Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1845XS (2) 91 cm/jh S.F. 294 Section 1. Section 598.10, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. In order to encourage compliance with a visitation order, 3 a temporary order for custody shall provide for a minimum 4 visitation schedule with the noncustodial parent, unless the 5 court determines that such visitation is not in the best 6 interest of the child. In considering the temporary order, the 7 court shall order on a temporary basis during the pendency of 8 the original custody proceeding temporary joint physical care 9 of the child to both parties unless a rebuttable presumption 10 exists against awarding physical care to one of the parties. 11 If the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that 12 joint physical care is inappropriate, the court shall cite the 13 reasons that joint physical care would be inappropriate using 14 the factors listed in section 598.41, subsection 3. 15